Utah statutes.
31A-43-302.   Stop-loss restrictions -- Filing requirements.

(1)  A stop-loss insurer shall demonstrate to the commissioner that the rates associated with specific and aggregate attachment points retained by a small employer group under the insurer's stop-loss plan are actuarially sound.

(2)  A stop-loss insurer shall file the stop-loss insurance contract form and rates with the commissioner pursuant to Sections 31A-2-201 and 31A-2-201.1 before the stop-loss insurance contract may be issued or delivered in the state.

(3)  A stop-loss insurer shall file with the commissioner, annually on or before April 1, in a form and manner required by the commissioner by administrative rule adopted by the commissioner:

(a)  an actuarial memorandum and certification which demonstrates that the insurer is in compliance with this chapter; and

(b)  the stop-loss insurer's stop-loss experience.

(4)  Each insurer shall maintain at its principal place of business:

(a)  a complete and detailed description of its rating practices and renewal underwriting practices, including information and documentation that demonstrate the rating methods and practices are:

(i)  based upon commonly accepted actuarial assumptions; and

(ii)  in accordance with sound actuarial principles; and

(b)  a copy of the actuarial certification required by Subsection (3).



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

